Utah statutes.
9-9-103.   Purpose.

The division shall:

(1)  develop programs that will allow Indian citizens residing on or off reservations an opportunity to share in the progress of Utah;

(2)  promote an atmosphere in which Indian citizens are provided alternatives so that individual citizens may choose for themselves the kinds of lives they will live, both socially and economically;

(3)  promote programs to help the tribes and Indian communities find and implement solutions to their community problems; and

(4)  promote government-to-government relations between the state and tribal governments.

